Louisiana, session 2026, HB992.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3914(C)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3914. Student information; privacy; legislative intent; definitions; prohibitions;
parental access; penalties
* * *
C.
* * *
(3) By not later than May 1, 2015, the The state Department of Education
shall develop a system of unique early childhood education identification numbers
and student identification numbers. An identification number shall not include or be
based on a social security number. A student shall retain his identification numbers
for his tenure in early childhood programs and public elementary and secondary
schools in Louisiana. Identification numbers shall be assigned as follows: By not
later than August 1, 2015, each
(a)(i) The state Department of Education shall assign an early childhood
education identification number to every child participating in a publicly funded
program at a prekindergarten program at a school or an early learning center as
defined in R.S. 17:407.33.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 992 ENROLLED
(ii) The state Department of Education may assign a early childhood
education identification number to every child participating in a program that does
not receive public funds at a prekindergarten program at a school or an early learning
center as defined in R.S. 17:407.33 whose parent or legal guardian has agreed to
provide the necessary information for assignment of a number.
(b) Each local public school board shall assign such a student identification
number to every student enrolled in a public elementary or secondary school, unless
the student already has a number assigned to him from his enrollment in an early
childhood program. By no later than December 31, 2027, each local public school
board shall link each early childhood education identification number assigned by
the state Department of Education to the corresponding student's student
identification number for the purposes of research and analysis of early childhood
programs. Student identification numbers shall not include or be based on social
security numbers, and a student shall retain his student identification number for his
tenure in Louisiana public elementary and secondary schools.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be initially implemented no later than
August 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.